New York, session 2025-2026, A5602.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The chief administrative judge of the New York unified 2 court system, in consultation with New York state courts access to 3 justice program, the unified court system's guardian and fiduciary 4 services office, the housing part of the New York city civil court, New 5 York city human resources administration and any other department, divi- 6 sion, board, bureau, commission, agency or public authority of the state 7 or any political subdivision thereof deemed necessary by the commission- 8 ers, shall prepare a comprehensive study and report on the access to 9 justice program's housing court guardian ad litem program. Such study 10 shall include an analysis of: (1) the total amount of guardians ad litem 11 appointed in New York state during fiscal years ending in 2025 and 2026; 12 (2) the number of guardian ad litem appointments which have been reim- 13 bursed, whether by municipal, state, or federal agencies or charitable 14 private or religious organizations; (3) an accounting of all funding 15 streams and budget allocations specifically identified for the guardian 16 ad litem program; (4) an analysis of current guardian ad litem compen- 17 sation and proposals for guardian ad litem compensation structure to 18 better incentivize guardian ad litem recruitment and retention. 19 § 2. The chief administrative judge of the New York unified court 20 system shall publish such report to the governor, the temporary presi- 21 dent of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of 22 the senate, and the minority leader of the assembly, no later than the 23 first day of July of the year succeeding the date on which this act 24 shall have become a law. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02550-01-5